Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.080

Eligibility to hold elective office.

No person shall be eligible to or hold an elective office in a town unless he or she is a resident and registered voter in the town.

[ 1997 c 361 s 8; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.080. Prior: 1890 p 200 s 149; RRS s 9170.]